Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 4. Refrigerators and Similar Equipment.

Sec. 18.60.400.
Refrigerator safety requirements.

A person may not dispose of an icebox, refrigerator, freezer, or similar equipment, other than a portable cooler, of a kind and size sufficient to permit the suffocation of a person inside the equipment without first removing the latches, hinges, or cover or otherwise rendering it safe.
A person may not maintain equipment described in this section in an area that is unattended by an adult and accessible to a minor unless the person ensures that the equipment does not present an unreasonable hazard to the safety of a minor.
A person may not allow a violation of this section on premises or in an area under the person’s control.

History.

(§ 1 ch 106 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 84 SLA 1990)

Sec. 18.60.410.
Equipment to have opening device on inside.

A person may not offer for sale an icebox, refrigerator, freezer, or similar equipment of a kind and size sufficient to permit the suffocation of a person unless the door can be opened easily from the inside, either by application of an outwardly directed force to the inside of the door or by the rotation of a knob similar to a conventional door knob.

History.

(§ 2 ch 106 SLA 1957; am § 2 ch 84 SLA 1990)

Sec. 18.60.420.
Administration of AS 18.60.400 — 18.60.460.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall administer AS

18.60.400

—

18.60.460

.
It may appoint inspectors and inspect all iceboxes, refrigerators, freezers, and similar equipment of a kind and size sufficient to permit the suffocation of a person if the equipment is shipped into the state.

History.

(§ 4 ch 106 SLA 1957; am § 3 ch 84 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.60.430.
Inspection of equipment.

Every person who sells equipment subject to inspection under AS

18.60.400

—

18.60.460

shall permit an authorized inspector to enter the premises where the equipment is stored, or offered for sale, for inspection during reasonable business hours.

History.

(§ 5 ch 106 SLA 1957)

Sec. 18.60.435.
Exemption.

Equipment of less than 1.5 cubic feet in capacity is exempt from the provisions of AS

18.60.400

—

18.60.460

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 84 SLA 1990)

Sec. 18.60.440.
Review.

A person aggrieved by an order or act of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development or of an inspector under AS

18.60.400

—

18.60.460

may, within 15 days after notice of the order or act, request a hearing under AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.640

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 106 SLA 1957; am § 5 ch 84 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 18.60.450.
Penalties for violations.

Except as provided in (b) of this section, a person who violates a provision of AS

18.60.400

—

18.60.460

is guilty of a violation.

A person who violates a provision of AS

18.60.400

—

18.60.460

who has previously been convicted of violating AS

18.60.400

—

18.60.460

is guilty of a misdemeanor for which the maximum term of imprisonment that may be imposed is 30 days and the maximum fine that may be imposed is $500.

The mental states that must be proved for an offense under (a) or (b) of this section are those described in AS

11.81.610(b)

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 106 SLA 1957; am § 6 ch 84 SLA 1990)

Sec. 18.60.460.
Enforcement.

Federal, state, and municipal law enforcement officers may enforce AS

18.60.400

—

18.60.460

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 106 SLA 1957)